anl/cwd_vs_crk/cwd_verb_affixes.lexc
LEXICON REDUPL_FRAG
RdplW+:ca VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:ka VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:ma VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:na VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:pa VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:sa VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:ta VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:wa VERB_FRAG ;
RdplW+:ya VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:câh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:kâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:mâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:nâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:pâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:sâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:tâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:wâh VERB_FRAG ;
RdplS+:yâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@cacâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ca-câh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@kakâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ka-kâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@mamâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ma-mâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@nanâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@na-nâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@nanâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@na-nâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@papâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@pa-pâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@sasâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@sa-sâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@tatâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ta-tâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@wawâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@wa-wâh VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.NULL@yayâh      VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@RdplW+RdplS+:@U.joiner.hyphen@ya-yâh VERB_FRAG ;
LEXICON REDUPL_BOUND
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@%<      REDUPL_CONT ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@-%< REDUPL_CONT ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@            VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC%<      REDUPL_CONT ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC-%< REDUPL_CONT ;
@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@:@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@%^IC            VERB_FRAG ;
LEXICON REDUPL_CONT
@U.wici.NULL@ VERBSTEMS ;
@U.wici.wici@ WICI ;
PREVERBS ;
LEXICON PREVERBS_BOUND
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@ VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC%^EGLOT%< VERBPREFIXES ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@%^IC-%<   VERBPREFIXES ;
@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@:@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@%^IC VERB_FRAG ;
LEXICON WICI
@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.NULL@@D.cnj.CC@wîci%^EGLOT%<      VERBSTEMS ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@D.cnj.CC@wîci-%<        VERBSTEMS ;
@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/wici+:@D.cnj.CC@@P.frag.FRAG@wîci            VERB_FRAG ;
@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.NULL@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@wîci%^IC%^EGLOT%<      VERBSTEMS ;
@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@:@U.joiner.hyphen@@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@wîci%^IC-%<        VERBSTEMS ;
@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@PV/wici+:@R.cnj.CC@@C.cnj@@P.frag.FRAG@wîci%^IC            VERB_FRAG ;
LEXICON VIIn
+V+II:  VIIn_SGPL_WICI ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG
+V+II:  VIIn_SG_WICI ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL
+V+II:  VIIw_PL_WICI ;
LEXICON VIIw
+V+II:  VIIw_SGPL_WICI ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG
+V+II:  VIIw_SG_WICI ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL
+V+II: VIIn_PL_WICI ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIw_SGPL_ORDER ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIw_SG_ORDER ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIw_PL_ORDER ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIn_SGPL_ORDER ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIn_SG_ORDER ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VIIn_PL_ORDER ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIw_SGPL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@  VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@  VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIn_SGPL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SGPL_IND_NULL ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_NULL ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SGPL_FUT_CON_NULL ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SG_IND_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_PL_IND_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SGPL_IND_NULL ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_NULL ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SGPL_FUT_CON_NULL ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SG_IND_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_PL_IND_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_IND_NULL
VIIn_SG_IND_SUFFIX ;
VIIn_PL_IND_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_IND_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>0 VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>ithiw VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_IND_SUFFIX
+3Pl:%>wa VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>ithiwa VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_IND_NULL
VIIw_SG_IND_SUFFIX ;
VIIw_PL_IND_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_IND_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>w VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>thiw VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_IND_SUFFIX
+3Pl:%>wa VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>thiwa VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_CNJ_NULL
VIIn_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
VIIn_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>k VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>ithik VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX
+3Pl:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+Var/East:%>kwâ VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+Var/East:%>kiht VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>ithiki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl+Var/East:%>ithikwâ VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_CNJ_NULL
VIIw_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
VIIw_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_CNJ_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>k VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>thik VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_CNJ_SUFFIX
+3Pl:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+Var/East:%>hki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+Var/East:%>kwâ VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+Var/East:%>kiht VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>thiki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl+Var/East:%>thikwâ VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIn_SGPL_FUT_CON_NULL
VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIn_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>ithiki VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIn_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>ithikwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIw_SGPL_FUT_CON_NULL
VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VIIw_SG_FUT_CON_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg:%>thiki VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VIIw_PL_FUT_CON_SUFFIX
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Pl:%>thikwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIw
+V+AI: VAIae_WICI ;
LEXICON VAIw_PL
+V+AI: VAIw_PL_WICI ;
LEXICON VAIae
+V+AI: VAIae_WICI ;
LEXICON VAIio
+V+AI: VAIio_WICI ;
LEXICON VAIn
+V+AI: VAIn_WICI ;
LEXICON VAIn_PL
+V+AI: VAIn_PL_WICI ;
LEXICON VAIm
+V+AI:  VTIm_WICI ;
LEXICON VAIw_PL_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VAIw_PL_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@%^COM%>i2m VTA_PL_ORDER ;
LEXICON VAIn_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VAIn_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@%>im VTA_ORDER ;
LEXICON VAIn_PL_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VAIn_PL_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@%>im VTA_PL_ORDER ;
LEXICON VAIae_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VAIae_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@%^COM%>i2m VTA_ORDER ;
LEXICON VAIio_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VAIio_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@%^COM%>i2m VTA_ORDER ;
LEXICON VAIn_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VAIn_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VAIn_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VAIn_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VAIn_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
